Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2130
Utilities district; water; sale; natural resources district; contract; uses.

(1) A metropolitan utilities district may contract to sell water to a natural resources district at such rates, for such charges, and upon such other terms and conditions as may be agreed upon in the contract.

(2) Such water shall be used by the natural resources district in a special improvement project supplying water for any beneficial use. With the consent of the metropolitan utilities district, such water may be used by the natural resources district in a special improvement project to supply the municipal waterworks and distribution system of a city of any class or village outside the boundaries of the metropolitan utilities district.

(3) Such municipalities are hereby empowered to contract with a natural resources district to purchase water at such rates, for such charges, and upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon in the contract.

Laws 1975, LB 245, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1111.02;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 30.